Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.011

Regulation of plant, plant product, bee movement, and genetically engineered organisms.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 17.24.041, the director may:

(1) Make rules under which plants, plant products, bees, hives and beekeeping equipment, and noxious weeds may be brought into this state from other states, territories, or foreign countries; and

(2) Make rules with reference to plants, plant products, bees, bee hives and equipment, and genetically engineered organisms while in transit through this state as may be deemed necessary to prevent the introduction into and dissemination within this state of plant and bee pests and noxious weeds.

[ 1991 c 257 s 5.]